Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
FORMAL PROCEEDINGS

§431:15-301 Grounds for rehabilitation.
(a) The commissioner may apply by petition to the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit for an order authorizing the commissioner to rehabilitate a
domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in this State, on any one or
more of the following grounds whenever the commissioner reasonably believes
that the insurer may be successfully rehabilitated without substantial increase
in the risk of loss to the insurer's policyholders, creditors, or to the
public:

(1) The insurer is insolvent;

(2) The insurer is in such condition that the further
transaction of business would be hazardous, financially, to its policyholders,
creditors or the public;

(3) There is reasonable cause to believe that there
has been embezzlement from the insurer, wrongful sequestration or diversion of
the insurer's assets, forgery or fraud affecting the insurer, or other illegal
conduct in, by, or with respect to the insurer that if established would endanger
assets in an amount threatening the solvency of the insurer;

(4) The insurer has failed to remove any person who
in fact has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager,
general agent, employee, or other person, if the person has been found after
notice and hearing by the commissioner to be dishonest or untrustworthy in a
way affecting the insurer's business;

(5) Control of the insurer, whether by stock
ownership or otherwise, and whether direct or indirect, is in a person or
persons found after notice and hearing to be untrustworthy;

(6) Any person who in fact has executive authority in
the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, director or trustee,
employee, or other person, has refused to be examined under oath by the
commissioner concerning its affairs, whether in this State or elsewhere, and
after reasonable notice of the fact the insurer has failed promptly and
effectively to terminate the employment and status of the person and all such
person's influence on management;

(7) After demand by the commissioner under article 2
or under this article, the insurer has failed to promptly make available for
examination any of its own property, books, accounts, documents, or other
records, or those of any subsidiary or related company within the control of
the insurer, or those of any person having executive authority in the insurer
so far as they pertain to the insurer;

(8) Without first obtaining the written consent of
the commissioner, the insurer has transferred, or attempted to transfer, in a
manner contrary to article 11 or section 431:3-215, substantially its entire
property or business, or has entered into any transaction the effect of which
is to merge, consolidate or reinsure substantially its entire property or business
in or with the property or business of any other person;

(9) The insurer or its property has been or is the
subject of an application for the appointment of a receiver, trustee,
custodian, conservator, or sequestrator, or similar fiduciary of the insurer or
its property, otherwise than as authorized under the insurance laws of this
State, and such appointment has been made or is imminent, and such appointment
might oust the courts of this State of jurisdiction or might prejudice orderly
delinquency proceedings under this article;

(10) Within the previous four years the insurer has
wilfully violated its charter or articles of incorporation, its bylaws, any
insurance law of this State, or any valid order of the commissioner under
section 431:15-201;

(11) The insurer has failed to pay within sixty days
after due date any obligation to any state or any subdivision thereof or any
judgment entered in any state, if the court in which such judgment was entered
had jurisdiction over such subject matter, except that such nonpayment shall
not be a ground until sixty days after any good faith effort by the insurer to
contest the obligation has been terminated, whether it is before the
commissioner or in the courts, or the insurer has established general business
practices which attempt to compromise or renegotiate previously agreed
settlements with its creditors on the ground that it is financially unable to
pay its obligations in full;

(12) The insurer has failed to file its annual report
or other financial report required by statute within the time allowed by law
and, after written demand by the commissioner, has failed to give an adequate
explanation immediately; or

(13) The board of directors or the holders of a
majority of the shares entitled to vote, or a majority of those individuals
entitled to the control of those entities request or consent to rehabilitation
under this article.

(b) Nothing herein contained shall be
construed as creating or enlarging any of the duties of the guaranty
associations as may be set forth in article 16. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next